Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3034.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 62, article 1, section 11, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Fiscal Agent 31,121,000 23,833,000 The base for this appropriation is $15,833,000 in fiscal year 2026 and each fiscal year thereafter. The appropriations under this section are to the commissioner of administration for the purposes specified. In-Lieu of Rent. $11,129,000 each year is for space costs of the legislature and veterans organizations, ceremonial space, and statutorily free space. Public Television. (a) $1,550,000 each year is for matching grants for public television. (b) $250,000 each year is for public television equipment grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 129D.13. (c) $500,000 each year is for block grants to public television under Minnesota Statutes, section 129D.13. Of this amount, up to three percent is for the commissioner of administration to administer the grants. This is a onetime appropriation. (d) The commissioner of administration must consider the recommendations of the Minnesota Public Television Association before allocating the amounts appropriated in paragraphs (a) and (b) for equipment or matching grants. Public Radio. (a) $2,392,000 the first year and $1,242,000 the second year are for community service grants to public educational radio stations. This appropriation may be used to disseminate emergency information in foreign languages. Any unencumbered balance does not cancel at the end of the first year and is available for the second year. (b) $142,000 each year is for equipment grants to public educational radio stations. This appropriation may be used for the repair, rental, and purchase of equipment including equipment under $500. (c) $850,000 the first year is for grants to the Association of Minnesota Public Educational Radio Stations for the purchase of emergency equipment and increased cybersecurity and broadcast technology. The Association of Minnesota Public Educational Radio Stations may use up to four percent of this appropriation for costs that are directly related to and necessary for the administration of these grants. (d) $1,288,000 the first year is for a grant to the Association of Minnesota Public Educational Radio Stations to provide a diverse community radio news service. Of this amount, up to $38,000 is for the commissioner of administration to administer this grant. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, deleted text begin 2027deleted text end new text begin 2028new text end . (e) $1,020,000 each year is for equipment grants to Minnesota Public Radio, Inc., including upgrades to Minnesota's Emergency Alert and AMBER Alert Systems. (f) The appropriations in paragraphs (a) to (e) may not be used for indirect costs claimed by an institution or governing body. (g) The commissioner of administration must consider the recommendations of the Association of Minnesota Public Educational Radio Stations before awarding grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 129D.14, using the appropriations in paragraphs (a) to (c). No grantee is eligible for a grant unless they are a member of the Association of Minnesota Public Educational Radio Stations on or before July 1, 2023. (h) Any unencumbered balance remaining the first year for grants to public television or public radio stations does not cancel and is available for the second year. Real Estate and Construction Services. $12,000,000 the first year and $8,000,000 the second year are to facilitate space consolidation and the transition to a hybrid work environment, including but not limited to the design, remodel, equipping, and furnishing of the space. This appropriation may also be used for relocation and rent loss. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; PUBLIC EDUCATIONAL RADIO STATIONS.new text end new text begin (a) $1,382,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,382,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of administration for community service grants to public educational radio stations. This appropriation may be used to disseminate emergency information in foreign languages. Any unencumbered balance does not cancel at the end of the first year and is available for the second year. The Association of Minnesota Public Educational Radio Stations may use up to four percent of this appropriation for administrative costs. new text end new text begin (b) $142,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $142,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of administration for equipment grants to public educational radio stations. This appropriation may be used for the repair, rental, purchase, and upgrades of equipment and software, including computer software, applications, firmware, and equipment under $500. new text end